Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1267
Venture Capital Network; established.

Consistent with the purpose stated in section 81-1266, the Department of Economic Development is directed to establish, from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to the department, the Venture Capital Network as a clearinghouse for information on informal risk capital investment opportunities in the fifty thousand to five hundred thousand dollar range in Nebraska.

Laws 1987, LB 163, § 3.